test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nganoTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈанунаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈанудаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈанудоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈанунась
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈанудась
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈанудась
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈанунинзь
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈанудинзь
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈанудинзь
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈанунаць
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈанудаць
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈанудонзь
     ӈано+N+Tra: ӈаноӈэ
     ӈано+N+Car: ӈаносиˮ
     ӈано+N+Equ: ӈанодаремʼ
     ӈано+N+Equ+Lat: ӈанодаревʼ
